isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX GE Y 69
SFX GE  se 0 .
SFX GE ti se l .
SFX GE ti se la .
SFX GE ti se lo .
SFX GE ti se li .
SFX GE těti se ču .
SFX GE ěti se im .
SFX GE ěti se iš .
SFX GE ěti se i .
SFX GE ěti se imo .
SFX GE ěti se ite .
SFX GE ěti se et .
SFX GE ti se h .
SFX GE ti se še .
SFX GE ti se hmo .
SFX GE ti se ste .
SFX GE ti se hu .
SFX GE ěti se eči .
SFX GE ěti se eča .
SFX GE ěti se eče .
SFX GE ěti se imy .
SFX GE ěti se imogo .
SFX GE ěti se imomu .
SFX GE ěti se imym .
SFX GE ěti se imom .
SFX GE ěti se imo .
SFX GE ěti se ima .
SFX GE ěti se imu .
SFX GE ěti se imoj .
SFX GE ěti se imoju .
SFX GE ěti se imi .
SFX GE ěti se ime .
SFX GE ěti se imyh .
SFX GE ěti se imym .
SFX GE ěti se imymi .
SFX GE ti se vši .
SFX GE ti se všego .
SFX GE ti se všemu .
SFX GE ti se všim .
SFX GE ti se všem .
SFX GE ti se vših .
SFX GE ti se všimi .
SFX GE ti se vša .
SFX GE ti se všu .
SFX GE ti se všej .
SFX GE ti se všeju .
SFX GE ti se vše .
SFX GE ti se ny .
SFX GE ti se nogo .
SFX GE ti se nomu .
SFX GE ti se nym .
SFX GE ti se nom .
SFX GE ti se ni .
SFX GE ti se ne .
SFX GE ti se nyh .
SFX GE ti se nymi .
SFX GE ti se na .
SFX GE ti se nu .
SFX GE ti se noj .
SFX GE ti se noju .
SFX GE ti se no .
SFX GE ti se nje .
SFX GE ti se nja .
SFX GE ti se nju .
SFX GE ti se njem .
SFX GE ti se nij .
SFX GE ti se njam .
SFX GE ti se njami .
SFX GE ti se njah .

SFX GF Y 62
SFX GF ti l .
SFX GF ti la .
SFX GF ti lo .
SFX GF ti li .
SFX GF rati oru .
SFX GF rati orem .
SFX GF rati oreš .
SFX GF rati ore .
SFX GF rati oremo .
SFX GF rati orete .
SFX GF rati orut .
SFX GF ti h .
SFX GF ti še .
SFX GF ti hmo .
SFX GF ti ste .
SFX GF ti hu .
SFX GF rati ori .
SFX GF rati orimo .
SFX GF rati orite .
SFX GF rati oruči .
SFX GF rati oručego .
SFX GF rati oručemu .
SFX GF rati oručim .
SFX GF rati oručem .
SFX GF rati oručih .
SFX GF rati oručimi .
SFX GF rati oruča .
SFX GF rati oruču .
SFX GF rati oručej .
SFX GF rati oručeju .
SFX GF rati oruče .
SFX GF rati oremy .
SFX GF rati oremogo .
SFX GF rati oremomu .
SFX GF rati oremym .
SFX GF rati oremom .
SFX GF rati oremo .
SFX GF rati orema .
SFX GF rati oremu .
SFX GF rati oremoj .
SFX GF rati oremoju .
SFX GF rati oremi .
SFX GF rati oreme .
SFX GF rati oremyh .
SFX GF rati oremym .
SFX GF rati oremymi .
SFX GF ti vši .
SFX GF ti všego .
SFX GF ti všemu .
SFX GF ti všim .
SFX GF ti všem .
SFX GF ti vših .
SFX GF ti všimi .
SFX GF ti vša .
SFX GF ti všu .
SFX GF ti všej .
SFX GF ti všeju .
SFX GF ti vše .
SFX GF i y .
SFX GF i a .
SFX GF i o .
SFX GF i je .

SFX GG Y 19
SFX GG or r .
SFX GG or ry .
SFX GG 0 y .
SFX GG or ra .
SFX GG 0 a .
SFX GG or rov .
SFX GG 0 ov .
SFX GG or ru .
SFX GG 0 u .
SFX GG or rah .
SFX GG 0 ah .
SFX GG or ram .
SFX GG 0 am .
SFX GG or rom .
SFX GG 0 om .
SFX GG or rami .
SFX GG 0 ami .
SFX GG or re .
SFX GG 0 e .

SFX GH Y 72
SFX GH  se 0 .
SFX GH ti se l .
SFX GH ti se la .
SFX GH ti se lo .
SFX GH ti se li .
SFX GH asti se u .
SFX GH asti se em .
SFX GH asti se eš .
SFX GH asti se e .
SFX GH asti se emo .
SFX GH asti se ete .
SFX GH asti se ut .
SFX GH ti se eh .
SFX GH ti se eše .
SFX GH ti se ehmo .
SFX GH ti se este .
SFX GH ti se ehu .
SFX GH asti se i .
SFX GH asti se imo .
SFX GH asti se ite .
SFX GH asti se uči .
SFX GH asti se učego .
SFX GH asti se učemu .
SFX GH asti se učim .
SFX GH asti se učem .
SFX GH asti se učih .
SFX GH asti se učimi .
SFX GH asti se uča .
SFX GH asti se uču .
SFX GH asti se učej .
SFX GH asti se učeju .
SFX GH asti se uče .
SFX GH asti se emy .
SFX GH asti se emogo .
SFX GH asti se emomu .
SFX GH asti se emym .
SFX GH asti se emom .
SFX GH asti se emo .
SFX GH asti se ema .
SFX GH asti se emu .
SFX GH asti se emoj .
SFX GH asti se emoju .
SFX GH asti se emi .
SFX GH asti se eme .
SFX GH asti se emyh .
SFX GH asti se emym .
SFX GH asti se emymi .
SFX GH ti se ši .
SFX GH ti se ša .
SFX GH ti se še .
SFX GH ti se eny .
SFX GH ti se enogo .
SFX GH ti se enomu .
SFX GH ti se enym .
SFX GH ti se enom .
SFX GH ti se eni .
SFX GH ti se ene .
SFX GH ti se enyh .
SFX GH ti se enymi .
SFX GH ti se ena .
SFX GH ti se enu .
SFX GH ti se enoj .
SFX GH ti se enoju .
SFX GH ti se eno .
SFX GH ti se enje .
SFX GH ti se enja .
SFX GH ti se enju .
SFX GH ti se enjem .
SFX GH ti se enij .
SFX GH ti se enjam .
SFX GH ti se enjami .
SFX GH ti se enjah .

SFX GI Y 81
SFX GI ti l .
SFX GI ti la .
SFX GI ti lo .
SFX GI ti li .
SFX GI ati u .
SFX GI ati em .
SFX GI ati eš .
SFX GI ati e .
SFX GI ati emo .
SFX GI ati ete .
SFX GI ati ut .
SFX GI ti h .
SFX GI ti še .
SFX GI ti hmo .
SFX GI ti ste .
SFX GI ti hu .
SFX GI ati i .
SFX GI ati imo .
SFX GI ati ite .
SFX GI ati uči .
SFX GI ati učego .
SFX GI ati učemu .
SFX GI ati učim .
SFX GI ati učem .
SFX GI ati učih .
SFX GI ati učimi .
SFX GI ati uča .
SFX GI ati uču .
SFX GI ati učej .
SFX GI ati učeju .
SFX GI ati uče .
SFX GI ati omy .
SFX GI ati omogo .
SFX GI ati omomu .
SFX GI ati omym .
SFX GI ati omom .
SFX GI ati omo .
SFX GI ati oma .
SFX GI ati omu .
SFX GI ati omoj .
SFX GI ati omoju .
SFX GI ati omi .
SFX GI ati ome .
SFX GI ati omyh .
SFX GI ati omym .
SFX GI ati omymi .
SFX GI ati omo .
SFX GI ti vši .
SFX GI ti všego .
SFX GI ti všemu .
SFX GI ti všim .
SFX GI ti všem .
SFX GI ti vših .
SFX GI ti všimi .
SFX GI ti vša .
SFX GI ti všu .
SFX GI ti všej .
SFX GI ti všeju .
SFX GI ti vše .
SFX GI ti ny .
SFX GI ti nogo .
SFX GI ti nomu .
SFX GI ti nym .
SFX GI ti nom .
SFX GI ti ni .
SFX GI ti ne .
SFX GI ti nyh .
SFX GI ti nymi .
SFX GI ti na .
SFX GI ti nu .
SFX GI ti noj .
SFX GI ti noju .
SFX GI ti no .
SFX GI ti nje .
SFX GI ti nja .
SFX GI ti nju .
SFX GI ti njem .
SFX GI ti nij .
SFX GI ti njam .
SFX GI ti njami .
SFX GI ti njah .

SFX GJ Y 80
SFX GJ ti l .
SFX GJ ti la .
SFX GJ ti lo .
SFX GJ ti li .
SFX GJ lati elju .
SFX GJ lati eljem .
SFX GJ lati elješ .
SFX GJ lati elje .
SFX GJ lati eljemo .
SFX GJ lati eljete .
SFX GJ lati eljut .
SFX GJ ti h .
SFX GJ ti še .
SFX GJ ti hmo .
SFX GJ ti ste .
SFX GJ ti hu .
SFX GJ lati elj .
SFX GJ lati eljmo .
SFX GJ lati eljte .
SFX GJ lati eljuči .
SFX GJ lati eljučego .
SFX GJ lati eljučemu .
SFX GJ lati eljučim .
SFX GJ lati eljučem .
SFX GJ lati eljučih .
SFX GJ lati eljučimi .
SFX GJ lati eljuča .
SFX GJ lati eljuču .
SFX GJ lati eljučej .
SFX GJ lati eljučeju .
SFX GJ lati eljuče .
SFX GJ lati eljemy .
SFX GJ lati eljemogo .
SFX GJ lati eljemomu .
SFX GJ lati eljemym .
SFX GJ lati eljemom .
SFX GJ lati eljemo .
SFX GJ lati eljema .
SFX GJ lati eljemu .
SFX GJ lati eljemoj .
SFX GJ lati eljemoju .
SFX GJ lati eljemi .
SFX GJ lati eljeme .
SFX GJ lati eljemyh .
SFX GJ lati eljemym .
SFX GJ lati eljemymi .
SFX GJ ti vši .
SFX GJ ti všego .
SFX GJ ti všemu .
SFX GJ ti všim .
SFX GJ ti všem .
SFX GJ ti vših .
SFX GJ ti všimi .
SFX GJ ti vša .
SFX GJ ti všu .
SFX GJ ti všej .
SFX GJ ti všeju .
SFX GJ ti vše .
SFX GJ ti ny .
SFX GJ ti nogo .
SFX GJ ti nomu .
SFX GJ ti nym .
SFX GJ ti nom .
SFX GJ ti ni .
SFX GJ ti ne .
SFX GJ ti nyh .
SFX GJ ti nymi .
SFX GJ ti na .
SFX GJ ti nu .
SFX GJ ti noj .
SFX GJ ti noju .
SFX GJ ti no .
SFX GJ ti nje .
SFX GJ ti nja .
SFX GJ ti nju .
SFX GJ ti njem .
SFX GJ ti nij .
SFX GJ ti njam .
SFX GJ ti njami .
SFX GJ ti njah .
